Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-237
School lands; lease; forfeiture; redemption; when allowed.

The owner of any lease forfeited as provided in section 72-235 may redeem by paying all delinquencies, fees, and costs of forfeiture at any time before the Board of Educational Lands and Funds completes the advertising of such land for lease at public auction.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 17, p. 309;

Laws 1903, c. 100, § 1, p. 571;

R.S.1913, § 5863;

C.S.1922, § 5199;

Laws 1927, c. 192, § 1, p. 548;

C.S.1929, § 72-219;

Laws 1935, c. 163, § 12, p. 605;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-219;

R.S.1943, § 72-237;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 29.

Holder of a lease of state school lands which has been declared forfeited for nonpayment of rentals may redeem from such forfeiture by paying all delinquencies, fees and costs of forfeiture at any time before such land is advertised to be leased at public auction. Stock Yards Nat. Bank v. Wyman, 130 Neb. 113, 264 N.W. 157 (1936).

An assignee of a lease of school lands, executed pursuant to Chapter 74, Laws 1883, who was delinquent in rental payments, was entitled to redeem from a forfeiture incurred by such delinquency at any time before such lands were released. Hile v. Troupe, 77 Neb. 199, 109 N.W. 218 (1906), affirmed on rehearing 84 Neb. 266, 121 N.W. 109 (1909).